ladina.dic
ācer/1,11004 po:adj
brevis/1,11006 po:adj
celer/1,11005 po:adj
dētestābilis/1,11006 po:adj
dissolūilis/1,11006 po:adj
gravis/1,11006 po:adj
immānis/1,11006 po:adj
līber/1,11003 po:adj
luber/1,11003 po:foopulcher
similis/1,11006 po:adj
variābilis/1,11006 po:adj
volūbilis/1,11006 po:adj
alter/1,11003 po:pron is:pron.adj
